Florida, session 2026, HB1431.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Part III of chapter 448, Florida Statutes,
consisting of ss. 448.31, 448.32, and 448.33, Florida Statutes,
is created and entitled the "Voluntary Portable Benefits Act."
Section 2. Section 448.31, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
448.31 Short title.—This part may be cited as the
"Voluntary Portable Benefits Act."
Section 3. Section 448.32, Florida Statutes, is created to
read:
448.32 Definitions.—As used in this part, the term:
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1431 2026
(1) "Hiring party" means a person who hires or enters into
a contract with an independent contractor or a sole proprietor.
(2)(a) "Independent contractor" means a person who meets
four of the following criteria:
1. Maintains a separate business with his or her own work
facility, truck, equipment, materials, or similar
accommodations.
2. Holds or has applied for a federal employer
identification number, unless the person is a sole proprietor
who is not required to obtain a federal employer identification
number under state or federal regulations.
3. Receives compensation for services rendered or work
performed and such compensation is paid to a business rather
than to an individual.
4. Holds one or more bank accounts in the name of the
business entity for purposes of paying business expenses or
other expenses related to services rendered or work performed
for compensation.
5. Performs work or is able to perform work for any entity
in addition to or besides the hiring party at his or her own
election without the necessity of completing an employment
application or process.
6. Receives compensation for work or services rendered on
a competitive-bid basis or completion of a task or a set of
tasks as defined by a contractual agreement, unless such
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1431 2026
contractual agreement expressly states that an employment
relationship exists.
(b) If a person does not meet at least four of the
criteria under paragraph (a), a person may still be presumed to
be an independent contractor and not an employee based on full
consideration of the nature of the person's situation with
regard to whether the person meets any of the following
conditions:
1. Performs or agrees to perform specific services or work
for a specific amount of money and controls the means of
performing the work or services.
2. Incurs the principal expenses related to the service or
work that he or she performs or agrees to perform.
3. Is responsible for the satisfactory completion of the
work or services that he or she performs or agrees to perform.
4. Receives compensation for work or services performed
for a commission or on a per-job basis and not on any other
basis.
5. May realize a profit or suffer a loss in connection
with performing work or services.
6. Has continuing or recurring business liabilities or
obligations.
7. Has success or failure in the person's business which
depends on the relationship of business receipts to
expenditures.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1431 2026
(3)(a) "Portable benefits account" means an account that
meets the following conditions:
1. The account is opened by an independent contractor or a
sole proprietor to fund the purchase of one or more benefit
plans and is administered by a third-party portable benefits
account provider chosen by the independent contractor or the
sole proprietor.
2. The account is assigned to a beneficiary of one or more
benefit plans rather than to a hiring party.
(b) As used in paragraph (a), the term "benefit plan"
includes, but is not limited to, the following products:
1. Health insurance.
2. Income replacement insurance.
3. Life insurance.
4. Retirement benefits.
(4) "Portable benefits account provider" means the
administrator of a portable benefits account and includes:
(a) A bank, as defined in s. 220.62(1).
(b) An investment management firm.
(c) A technology provider or program manager that offers
services through a bank or investment management firm.
(d) Any other person that demonstrates to the satisfaction
of the Financial Services Commission that the manner in which
the person will administer the portable benefits account will be
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1431 2026
100 consistent with the portable benefits account requirements under
101 s. 448.33.
102 (5) "Sole proprietor" has the same meaning as in s.
103 440.02.
104 Section 4. Section 448.33, Florida Statutes, is created to
105 read:
106 448.33 Voluntary contributions to portable benefits
107 accounts for independent contractors and sole proprietors.—
108 (1) Any person or entity, including an independent
109 contractor; a sole proprietor; a hiring party, whether a public
110 or private entity; or an Internet-based or application-based
111 company, may voluntarily contribute funds to a portable benefits
112 account for an independent contractor or a sole proprietor.
113 (2)(a) Contributions to a portable benefits account may
114 not be used as a criterion for determining a worker's employment
115 classification.
116 (b) Contributions to a portable benefits account may be
117 made using:
118 1. The funds of the hiring party; or
119 2. A percentage of funds withheld from compensation owed
120 to the independent contractor or sole proprietor if all the
121 following conditions are met:
122 a. The withholdings are voluntary and expressly agreed to
123 in writing, and the agreement is written in clear and
124 unambiguous language and prominently displayed in the work
Page 5 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1431-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1431 2026
125 contract or a separate notice.
126 b. The withholdings require the independent contractor or
127 sole proprietor to opt in, and the independent contractor or
128 sole proprietor may choose to opt out of the withholdings at any
129 time.
130 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 6 of 6
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1431-00